Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6129SS (4) 91 da/js S.F. 2356 Section 1. Section 459.312, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. A person required to submit a manure 3 management plan to the department shall monitor the application 4 of the manure, and conditions after the application of the 5 manure, if the manure is applied in proximity to a surface 6 water source or groundwater source. The process of monitoring 7 shall occur during the period of application, immediately 8 following the application, or later if climatic conditions 9 increase the risk that the applied manure may be discharged 10 into the surface water source or groundwater source. If there 11 is a risk of a discharge, the person shall file a report with 12 the department detailing where the discharge may have occurred 13 and the level of risk posed by the possible discharge. The 14 department shall publish information contained in the report 15 on its internet site, and investigate the site of the possible 16 discharge. 17